test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VINIT_IMPER_aakozi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  VAI - VINIT - aakozi - IMPER :

  #Template Key
  #1
  #imperative

     #Isolation form
     aakozi: aakozi
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     aakozi+Imm21: aakozidaa
     aakozi+Imm2Pl: aakozig
     aakozi+Imm2Sg: aakozin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     aakozi+Del2Pl: aakozikag
     aakozi+Del2Sg: aakozikan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     aakozi+Prob21: aakozisiidaa
     aakozi+Prob2Pl: aakozikegon
     aakozi+Prob2Sg: aakoziken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     aakozi+Imm21+Del2Pl: aakozidaakag
     aakozi+Imm21+Del2Sg: aakozidaakan
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl: aakozigkag
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg: aakozigkan
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl: aakozinkag
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg: aakozinkan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     aakozi+Imm21+Prob21: aakozidaasiidaa
     aakozi+Imm21+Prob2Pl: aakozidaakegon
     aakozi+Imm21+Prob2Sg: aakozidaaken
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Prob21: aakozigsiidaa
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Prob2Pl: aakozigkegon
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Prob2Sg: aakozigken
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Prob21: aakozinsiidaa
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Prob2Pl: aakozinkegon
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Prob2Sg: aakozinken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     aakozi+Del2Pl+Prob21: aakozikagsiidaa
     aakozi+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: aakozikagkegon
     aakozi+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: aakozikagken
     aakozi+Del2Sg+Prob21: aakozikansiidaa
     aakozi+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: aakozikankegon
     aakozi+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: aakozikanken
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     aakozi+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob21: aakozidaakagsiidaa
     aakozi+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: aakozidaakagkegon
     aakozi+Imm21+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: aakozidaakagken
     aakozi+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob21: aakozidaakansiidaa
     aakozi+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: aakozidaakankegon
     aakozi+Imm21+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: aakozidaakanken
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob21: aakozigkagsiidaa
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: aakozigkagkegon
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: aakozigkagken
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob21: aakozigkansiidaa
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: aakozigkankegon
     aakozi+Imm2Pl+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: aakozigkanken
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob21: aakozinkagsiidaa
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob2Pl: aakozinkagkegon
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Del2Pl+Prob2Sg: aakozinkagken
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob21: aakozinkansiidaa
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob2Pl: aakozinkankegon
     aakozi+Imm2Sg+Del2Sg+Prob2Sg: aakozinkanken
     
